Utah statutes.
17-27a-610.   Restrictions for solar and other energy devices.
The land use authority may refuse to approve or renew any plat, subdivision
plan, or dedication of any street or other ground, if deed restrictions,
covenants, or similar binding agreements running with the land for the lots or
parcels covered by the plat or subdivision prohibit or have the effect of
prohibiting reasonably sited and designed solar collectors, clotheslines, or
other energy devices based on renewable resources from being installed on
buildings erected on lots or parcels covered by the plat or subdivision.
